Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 6
C

OASTAL MANAGEMENT

Law reviews.

-
For article commenting on the enactment of this part, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 42 (1997).

12-5-320. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Coastal Management Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-5-320

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

12-5-321. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the coastal area of Georgia comprises a vital natural resource system. The General Assembly recognizes that the coastal area of Georgia is the habitat of many species of marine life and wildlife which must have clean waters and suitable habitat to survive. The General Assembly further finds that intensive research has revealed that activities affecting the coastal area may degrade water quality or damage coastal resources if not properly planned and managed. The General Assembly further finds that the coastal area provides a natural recreation resource which has become vitally linked to the economy of Georgia's coast and to that of the entire state. The General Assembly further finds that resources within this coastal area are costly, if not impossible, to reconstruct or rehabilitate once adversely affected by human related activities and it is important to conserve these resources for the present and future use and enjoyment of all citizens and visitors to this state. The General Assembly further finds that the coastal area is a vital area of the state and that it is essential to maintain the health, safety, and welfare of all the citizens of the state. Therefore, the General Assembly declares that the management of the coastal area has more than local significance, is of equal importance to all citizens of the state, is of state-wide concern, and consequently is properly a matter for coordinated regulation under the police power of the state. The General Assembly further finds and declares that activities and structures in the coastal area must be regulated to ensure that the values and functions of coastal waters and natural habitats are not impaired and to fulfill the responsibilities of each generation as public trustees of the coastal waters and habitats for succeeding generations.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-321

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For comment, " 'Wrest' in Peace:
The Effect of the Georgia Environmental Protection Division's â€˜Wrested Vegetation Rule' on Coastal Salt Marshes," see 32 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 953 (2016).

12-5-322. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Activity" or "activities" means an action or actions which will have reasonably foreseeable effects upon land use, water use, or natural resources of the coastal area.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Certification of consistency" means a certification made by a person in connection with an application for a federally administered permit to conduct an activity or activities as defined in this Code section. Such certification of consistency shall be based on determination of the activity's compliance with the policies of the Georgia coastal management program. Only those activities requiring a federally administered permit will require such certification of consistency.

"Coastal area" or "coastal zone" means all tidally influenced waters and submerged land seaward to the state's jurisdictional limits and all lands, submerged lands, waters, and other resources within the Counties of Brantley, Bryan, Camden, Charlton, Chatham, Effingham, Glynn, Long, Liberty, McIntosh, and Wayne.

"Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.

"Determination of consistency" means a determination made by a federal agency proposing an activity or activities as defined in this Code section. Such determination of consistency shall be based on a determination of the activity's effects upon the coastal area. Only those activities proposed to be undertaken by a federal agency will be subject to a determination of consistency.

"Federal agency" means the United States government and all its departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and wholly owned corporations owned by the federal government.

"Federally administered permit" means only those permits, licenses, or approvals required by federal law or regulation and issued by an agency of the federal government.

"Georgia coastal management program" means a compilation of policies to guide the public and private uses of land and waters within the coastal area administered by the department in consultation with the state agencies and local governments of the coastal area and approved by the secretary of commerce in accordance with the requirements of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972, as amended, 16 U.S.C. Sections 1451 and following.

"Local government" means a county, as defined by Code Section 36-1-1, or an incorporated municipality, as defined by Code Section 36-40-21, or any combination thereof, which has been authorized by an Act of the General Assembly, any of which has within its jurisdiction any coastal area.

"Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, municipal corporation, local government, association, state agency, or public or private authority.

"Policy" or "policies" of the Georgia coastal management program means the enforceable provisions of present or future applicable statutes of this state or regulations duly promulgated thereunder.

"State agency" means this state and all its departments, boards, authorities, bureaus, and commissions.

"State permit" means all those permits, licenses, or approvals, whether required by a federal or state law, which are administered by a state agency.

"Submerged land" means all lands lying or being under tidally influenced waters of the state.

"Tidally influenced waters" means any water where the tide ebbs and floods on a daily basis.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-322

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "Counties" was substituted for "counties" in paragraph (4), and "secretary of commerce" was substituted for "Secretary of Commerce" in paragraph (9).

12-5-323. Powers and duties of department.

The department shall have the following authority, which shall not be delegated to any other state agency:

To prepare and administer a Georgia coastal management program and to monitor and inform appropriate local, state, and federal agencies concerning enforcement of this part and all rules, regulations, and orders upon which the Georgia coastal management program is based;

To accept, expend, grant, and administer moneys that are available from persons or federal agencies to carry out the provisions of this part;

To conduct public hearings on the Georgia coastal management program or any actions taken under this part;

To concur or object to a certification of consistency filed by a person only in connection with an application for a federally administered permit and to concur or object to a determination of consistency filed by a federal agency in connection with a federal activity based on the policies of the Georgia coastal management program established pursuant to this part; provided, however, that if, prior to completion of review of a federally administered permit or federal activity under this part, the department receives notice of the denial of a state permit necessary for the activity, the department shall object to all certifications of consistency or determinations of consistency relating to the proposed activity filed by such person or federal agency; provided, further, that nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent the department from withdrawing such objection; and

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-323

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, the subsection (a) designation was deleted as there was no subsection (b).

12-5-324. Power of board to promulgate rules and regulations.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of the Georgia coastal management program in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-5-324

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

12-5-325. Additional duties of department.

The department shall, in addition to its other duties prescribed by law, coordinate and cooperate with other state agencies, as necessary, as provided in paragraph (1) of Code Section 12-5-323, and to make reasonable inspections within the coastal area where activities have been proposed to determine whether the proposed activities are consistent with this part and the policies of the Georgia coastal management program as provided in paragraph (4) of Code Section 12-5-323.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-325

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "of subsection (a)" was deleted following "paragraph (1)" and following "paragraph (4)".

12-5-326. Duties of other state agencies in relation to this part.

All state agencies shall coordinate and cooperate with the department in the administration of this part. All state agencies exercising regulatory authority or management or planning authority in the coastal area shall administer such authority in conformity with the provisions of this part and shall apply such regulatory authority in a manner consistent with the policies of the Georgia coastal management program. All state agencies and local governments exercising statutory authority in the coastal area are authorized to enter into agreements regarding implementation of the Georgia coastal management program within their legal authority.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-326

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

12-5-327. Duty of department to prepare document for submission to Governor; duty to prepare report every three years.

The department shall prepare a document reflecting the Georgia coastal management program for submission to the Governor. The Governor shall have the authority to review and approve such document. Once approved, the Governor shall have the authority to submit the document reflecting the Georgia coastal management program to the secretary of commerce for approval as outlined in the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972, as amended. At any time, the Governor, with the concurrence of the General Assembly, may withdraw the state from participation in the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 if it is determined that continued participation is not in the best interest of the state.

The department shall make a report every three years of its activities under this part to the Governor and General Assembly. The report shall include a summary of the effectiveness of the program, a survey of user groups, and the department's opinion of the value of Georgia's continued participation in the program. Copies of the report shall be provided to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the chairperson of the House Natural Resources and Environment Committee, the chairperson of the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee, and the Board of Natural Resources.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-327

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 13/HB 117.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "secretary of commerce" was substituted for "Secretary of Commerce" in subsection (a) and "chairperson" was substituted for "Chairperson" in two places in subsection (b).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2009, p. 303,

§

20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."

12-5-328. Nothing in part to be construed as waiver of federal immunity or consent for other state to exercise jurisdiction.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed as a consent to waiver of immunity under the Eleventh Amendment of the United States Constitution or consent for any other state to exercise regulatory jurisdiction within the boundaries of this state.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-328

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037, § 1.)

12-5-329. Repeal of part on July 1, 2009.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 117, § 2/HB 68, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Code 1981,

§

12-5-329

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1037,

§

1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 260,

§

1.